Alaska statutes. Title 17. Food and Drugs.
Chapter 05. Standards of Sale for Food and Drink.

Secs. 17.05.010,
17.05.020.
Sale of diseased, corrupted, or unwholesome provisions prohibited; adulteration prohibited. [Repealed, § 26 ch 72 SLA 1998.]

Sec. 17.05.030.
Sale of dehydrated, powdered, or reconstituted milk. [Repealed, § 3 ch 193 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 17.05.040.
Penalty for violation of AS 17.05.030.
[Repealed,
§ 18 ch 94 SLA 1980.]

Sec. 17.05.050.
Re-serving prohibited. [Repealed, § 26 ch 72 SLA 1998.]

Secs. 17.05.060 — 17.05.160.
[Renumbered as AS 17.07.010 — 17.07.200.]